lexica/verbs_overrides.lexc
LEXICON Root

! Biti, the auxiliary verb.  It's quite irregular, so we just put it here.
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Infinitive:biti #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Supine:bit #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Conditional:bi #;

biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+First+Sing+NoGender+NotNegative:sem #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+First+Dual+NoGender+NotNegative:sva #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+First+Plural+NoGender+NotNegative:smo #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+Second+Sing+NoGender+NotNegative:si #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+Second+Dual+NoGender+NotNegative:sta #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+Second+Plural+NoGender+NotNegative:ste #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+Third+Sing+NoGender+NotNegative:je #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+Third+Dual+NoGender+NotNegative:sta #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+Third+Plural+NoGender+NotNegative:so #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+First+Sing+NoGender+Negative:nisem #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+First+Dual+NoGender+Negative:nisva #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+First+Plural+NoGender+Negative:nismo #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+Second+Sing+NoGender+Negative:nisi #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+Second+Dual+NoGender+Negative:nista #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+Second+Plural+NoGender+Negative:niste #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+Third+Sing+NoGender+Negative:ni #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+Third+Dual+NoGender+Negative:nista #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Present+Third+Plural+NoGender+Negative:niso #;

biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Future+First+Sing+NoGender+NotNegative:bom #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Future+First+Dual+NoGender+NotNegative:bova #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Future+First+Plural+NoGender+NotNegative:bomo #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Future+Second+Sing+NoGender+NotNegative:boš #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Future+Second+Dual+NoGender+NotNegative:bosta #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Future+Second+Plural+NoGender+NotNegative:boste #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Future+Third+Sing+NoGender+NotNegative:bo #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Future+Third+Dual+NoGender+NotNegative:bosta #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Future+Third+Plural+NoGender+NotNegative:bodo #;
biti+V+Auxiliary+NoAspect+Future+Third+Plural+NoGender+NotNegative:bojo #;


! There are only two verbs that are specified for negativity, so it made sense
! to me to just special case them here, rather than try to come up with
! complicated rules for them.  The main problem is getting the negative marker
! to show up at the end, for producing MSD output.
! Imeti
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+First+Sing+NoGender+NotNegative:imam #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+First+Dual+NoGender+NotNegative:imava #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+First+Plural+NoGender+NotNegative:imamo #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Second+Sing+NoGender+NotNegative:imaš #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Second+Dual+NoGender+NotNegative:imata #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Second+Plural+NoGender+NotNegative:imate #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Third+Sing+NoGender+NotNegative:ima #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Third+Dual+NoGender+NotNegative:imata #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Third+Plural+NoGender+NotNegative:imajo #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+First+Sing+NoGender+Negative:nimam #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+First+Dual+NoGender+Negative:nimava #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+First+Plural+NoGender+Negative:nimamo #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Second+Sing+NoGender+Negative:nimaš #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Second+Dual+NoGender+Negative:nimata #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Second+Plural+NoGender+Negative:nimate #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Third+Sing+NoGender+Negative:nima #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Third+Dual+NoGender+Negative:nimata #;
imeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Third+Plural+NoGender+Negative:nimajo #;
! Hoteti
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+First+Sing+NoGender+NotNegative:hočem #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+First+Dual+NoGender+NotNegative:hočeva #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+First+Plural+NoGender+NotNegative:hočemo #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Second+Sing+NoGender+NotNegative:hočeš #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Second+Dual+NoGender+NotNegative:hočeta #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Second+Plural+NoGender+NotNegative:hočete #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Third+Sing+NoGender+NotNegative:hoče #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Third+Dual+NoGender+NotNegative:hočeta #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Third+Plural+NoGender+NotNegative:hočejo #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+First+Sing+NoGender+Negative:nočem #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+First+Dual+NoGender+Negative:nočeva #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+First+Plural+NoGender+Negative:nočemo #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Second+Sing+NoGender+Negative:nočeš #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Second+Dual+NoGender+Negative:nočeta #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Second+Plural+NoGender+Negative:nočete #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Third+Sing+NoGender+Negative:noče #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Third+Dual+NoGender+Negative:nočeta #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Third+Plural+NoGender+Negative:nočejo #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Imperative+First+Dual:hotiva #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Imperative+First+Plural:hotimo #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Imperative+Second+Dual:hotita #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Imperative+Second+Plural:hotite #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Imperative+Second+Sing:hoti #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Infinitive:hoteti #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Dual+Fem:hoteli #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Dual+Masc:hotela #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Dual+Neut:hoteli #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Plural+Fem:hotele #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Plural+Masc:hoteli #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Plural+Neut:hotela #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Sing+Fem:hotela #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Sing+Masc:hotel #;
hoteti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Sing+Neut:hotelo #;

! Smeti
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Infinitive:smeti #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Dual+Fem:smeli #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Dual+Masc:smela #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Dual+Neut:smeli #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Plural+Fem:smele #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Plural+Masc:smeli #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Plural+Neut:smela #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Sing+Fem:smela #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Sing+Masc:smel #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Participle+NoPerson+Sing+Neut:smelo #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+First+Dual:smeva #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+First+Plural:smemo #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+First+Sing:smem #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Second+Dual:smeta #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Second+Plural:smete #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Second+Sing:smeš #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Third+Dual:smeta #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Third+Plural:smejo #;
smeti+V+Main+Progressive+Present+Third+Sing:sme #;

! Some other odd cases
lezti+V+Main+Biaspectual+Infinitive:lezti #;
lezti+V+Main+Biaspectual+Supine:lezt #;
grizti+V+Main+Biaspectual+Infinitive:grizti #;
grizti+V+Main+Biaspectual+Supine:grizt #;
